Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1109
Least restrictive alternative, defined.

Least restrictive alternative means a placement and services provided in a manner no more restrictive of a subject's liberty and no more intrusive than necessary to provide appropriate treatment and protect society.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 9.